Utah statutes.
25-6-2.   Definitions.
In this chapter:
(1)  "Affiliate" means:
(a)  a person who directly or indirectly owns, controls, or holds with power
to vote, 20% or more of the outstanding voting securities of the debtor, other
than a person who holds the securities:
(i)  as a fiduciary or agent without sole discretionary power to vote the
securities; or
(ii)  solely to secure a debt, if the person has not exercised the power to
vote;
(b)  a corporation 20% or more of whose outstanding voting securities are
directly or indirectly owned, controlled, or held with power to vote, by the
debtor or a person who directly or indirectly owns, controls, or holds, with
power to vote, 20% or more of the outstanding voting securities of the debtor,
other than a person who holds the securities:
(i)  as a fiduciary or agent without sole power to vote the securities; or
(ii)  solely to secure a debt, if the person has not exercised the power to
vote;
(c)  a person whose business is operated by the debtor under a lease or other
agreement, or a person substantially all of whose assets are controlled by the
debtor; or
(d)  a person who operates the debtor's business under a lease or other
agreement or controls substantially all of the debtor's assets.
(2)  "Asset" means property of a debtor, but does not include:
(a)  property to the extent it is encumbered by a valid lien;
(b)  property to the extent it is generally exempt under nonbankruptcy law; or
(c)  an interest in property held in tenancy by the entireties to the extent
it is not subject to process by a creditor holding a claim against only one
tenant.
(3)  "Claim" means a right to payment, whether or not the right is reduced to
judgment, liquidated, unliquidated, fixed, contingent, matured, unmatured,
disputed, undisputed, legal, equitable, secured, or unsecured.
(4)  "Creditor" means a person who has a claim.
(5)  "Debt" means liability on a claim.
(6)  "Debtor" means a person who is liable on a claim.
(7)  "Insider" includes:
(a)  if the debtor is an individual:
(i)  a relative of the debtor or of a general partner of the debtor;
(ii)  a partnership in which the debtor is a general partner;
(iii)  a general partner in a partnership described in Subsection (7)(a)(ii);
(iv)  a corporation of which the debtor is a director, officer, or person in
control; or
(v)  a limited liability company of which the debtor is a member or manager;
(b)  if the debtor is a corporation:
(i)  a director of the debtor;
(ii)  an officer of the debtor;
(iii)  a person in control of the debtor;
(iv)  a partnership in which the debtor is a general partner;
(v)  a general partner in a partnership described in Subsection (7)(b)(iv);
(vi)  a limited liability company of which the debtor is a member or manager;
or
(vii)  a relative of a general partner, director, officer, or person in
control of the debtor;
(c)  if the debtor is a partnership:
(i)  a general partner in the debtor;
(ii)  a relative of a general partner in, a general partner of, or a person in
control of the debtor;
(iii)  another partnership in which the debtor is a general partner;
(iv)  a general partner in a partnership described in Subsection (7)(c)(iii);
(v)  a limited liability company of which the debtor is a member or manager;
or
(vi)  a person in control of the debtor;
(d)  if the debtor is a limited liability company:
(i)  a member or manager of the debtor;
(ii)  another limited liability company in which the debtor is a member or
manager;
(iii)  a partnership in which the debtor is a general partner;
(iv)  a general partner in a partnership described in Subsection (7)(d)(iii);
(v)  a person in control of the debtor; or
(vi)  a relative of a general partner, member, manager, or person in control
of the debtor;
(e)  an affiliate, or an insider of an affiliate as if the affiliate were the
debtor; and
(f)  a managing agent of the debtor.
(8)  "Lien" means a charge against or an interest in property to secure
payment of a debt or performance of an obligation, and includes a security
interest created by agreement, a judicial lien obtained by legal or equitable
process or proceedings, a common-law lien, or a statutory lien.
(9)  "Person" means an individual, partnership, limited liability company,
corporation, association, organization, government or governmental subdivision
or agency, business trust, estate, trust, or any other legal or commercial
entity.
(10)  "Property" means anything that may be the subject of ownership.
(11)  "Relative" means an individual or an individual related to a spouse,
related by consanguinity within the third degree as determined by the common
law, or a spouse, and includes an individual in an adoptive relationship
within the third degree.
(12)  "Transfer" means every mode, direct or indirect, absolute or
conditional, or voluntary or involuntary, of disposing of or parting with an
asset or an interest in an asset, and includes payment of money, release,
lease, and creation of a lien or other encumbrance.
(13)  "Valid lien" means a lien that is effective against the holder of a
judicial lien subsequently obtained by legal or equitable process or
proceedings.
